src/derivation/crk.twolc
! Phonology 

Alphabet

  a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z
  A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z
  â ê

  %/:0
  ;

Rules

  "Diminutive palatalization rule"
  t:c <=> _ ?* %/  [ i s ( i s ) | s i ] [ %/ | .#. ] ;

  "e to a rule"
  ê:â <=> %/ _ %/ n %/ ; 

  "w to o rule"
  w:o <=> [ c | h | k | m | n | p | s | t ] _ %/ [ c | h | k | m | n | p | s | t ] ; 

  "t palatalization rule"
  t:c <=>  _ %/ i [ %/ | .#. ] ;

  "w to o rule 2"
  w:o <=> _ %/ i:0 ;
